Utah statutes.
41-3-401.   Disclosure of financing arrangements relating to the sale of
motor vehicles.
(1) (a)  A dealer may not issue a temporary permit or release possession of a
motor vehicle that the dealer has sold to someone other than another dealer
unless the document of sale contains one of the disclosures listed in
Subsection (2).
(b)  The disclosures shall be set forth clearly and conspicuously on the first
or front page of the sale document at the time of sale, executed by the
purchaser, and for Subsection (2)(b), executed by the seller also.
(2) (a)  The form to be used when financing is the purchaser's responsibility
shall read as follows:
"THE PURCHASER OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE DESCRIBED IN THIS CONTRACT ACKNOWLEDGES
THAT THE SELLER OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE HAS MADE NO PROMISES, WARRANTIES, OR
REPRESENTATIONS REGARDING SELLER'S ABILITY TO OBTAIN FINANCING FOR THE
PURCHASE OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE. FURTHERMORE, PURCHASER UNDERSTANDS THAT IF
FINANCING IS NECESSARY IN ORDER FOR THE PURCHASER TO COMPLETE THE PAYMENT
TERMS OF THIS CONTRACT ALL THE FINANCING ARRANGEMENTS ARE THE SOLE
RESPONSIBILITY OF THE PURCHASER.
____________________________________________
(Signature of the purchaser)"
(b)  The form to be used when the seller agrees to seek arrangements for
financing shall read as follows:
"(1)  THE PURCHASER OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE DESCRIBED IN THIS CONTRACT HAS
EXECUTED THE CONTRACT IN RELIANCE UPON THE SELLER'S REPRESENTATION THAT THE
SELLER CAN PROVIDE FINANCING ARRANGEMENTS FOR THE PURCHASE OF THE MOTOR
VEHICLE. THE PRIMARY TERMS OF THE FINANCING ARE AS FOLLOWS:
INTEREST RATE BETWEEN ______ % AND ______ % PER ANNUM, TERM BETWEEN
_____________ MONTHS AND _____________ MONTHS. MONTHLY PAYMENTS BETWEEN $
____________ PER MONTH AND $ ____________ PER MONTH BASED ON A DOWN PAYMENT OF
$ ______________.
(2) (a)  IF SELLER IS NOT ABLE TO ARRANGE FINANCING WITHIN THE TERMS
DISCLOSED, THEN SELLER MUST WITHIN SEVEN CALENDAR DAYS OF THE DATE OF SALE
MAIL NOTICE TO THE PURCHASER THAT HE HAS NOT BEEN ABLE TO ARRANGE FINANCING.
(b)  PURCHASER THEN HAS 14 DAYS FROM THE DATE OF SALE TO ELECT, IF PURCHASER
CHOOSES, TO RESCIND THE CONTRACT OF SALE PURSUANT TO SECTION 41-3-401.
(c)  IN ORDER TO RESCIND THE CONTRACT OF SALE, THE PURCHASER SHALL:
(i)  RETURN TO SELLER THE MOTOR VEHICLE HE PURCHASED;
(ii)  PAY THE SELLER AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO THE CURRENT STANDARD MILEAGE RATE FOR
THE COST OF OPERATING A MOTOR VEHICLE ESTABLISHED BY THE FEDERAL INTERNAL
REVENUE SERVICE FOR EACH MILE THE MOTOR VEHICLE HAS BEEN DRIVEN; AND
(iii)  COMPENSATE SELLER FOR ANY PHYSICAL DAMAGE TO THE MOTOR VEHICLE.
(3)  IN RETURN, SELLER SHALL GIVE BACK TO THE PURCHASER ALL PAYMENTS OR OTHER
CONSIDERATION PAID BY THE PURCHASER, INCLUDING ANY DOWN PAYMENT AND ANY MOTOR
VEHICLE TRADED IN.
(4)  IF THE TRADE-IN HAS BEEN SOLD OR OTHERWISE DISPOSED OF BEFORE THE
PURCHASER RESCINDS THE TRANSACTION, THEN THE SELLER SHALL RETURN TO THE
PURCHASER A SUM EQUIVALENT TO THE ALLOWANCE TOWARD THE PURCHASE PRICE GIVEN BY
THE SELLER FOR THE TRADE-IN, AS NOTED IN THE DOCUMENT OF SALE.
(5)  IF PURCHASER DOES NOT ELECT TO RESCIND THE CONTRACT OF SALE AS PROVIDED
IN SUBSECTION (2)(b) OF THIS FORM:
(a)  THE PURCHASER IS RESPONSIBLE FOR ADHERENCE TO THE TERMS AND CONDITIONS OF
THE CONTRACT OR RISKS BEING FOUND IN DEFAULT OF THE TERMS AND CONDITIONS;
(b)  THE TERMS AND CONDITIONS OF THE DISCLOSURES SET FORTH IN SECTION (1) OF
THIS FORM ARE NOT BINDING ON THE SELLER; AND
(c)  IF FINANCING IS NECESSARY FOR THE PURCHASER TO COMPLETE THE PAYMENT TERMS
OF THE CONTRACT OF SALE, THE PURCHASER IS SOLELY RESPONSIBLE FOR MAKING ALL
THE FINANCING ARRANGEMENTS.
(6)  SIGNING THIS DISCLOSURE DOES NOT PROHIBIT THE PURCHASER FROM SEEKING HIS
OWN FINANCING.
_______________________________________
(Signature of the purchaser)
_______________________________________
(Signature of the seller)"
(3) (a) (i)  In addition to the penalties in this chapter, if the disclosures
in Subsection (2) are not properly executed or if the seller is unable to
provide the financing arrangements for the purchaser as provided in Subsection
(2)(b) within seven calendar days immediately following the sale date
disclosed on the document of sale, then in either case the purchaser may
return the purchased motor vehicle to the dealer and receive a complete refund
of all money and other consideration given to the dealer for the purchase,
including any motor vehicle or property used as a trade-in.
(ii)  If the motor vehicle or property used as a trade-in has been sold or
otherwise disposed of, the seller shall return to the purchaser the amount of
money equivalent to the allowance towards the purchase price given by the
dealer for the motor vehicle or property traded in, as noted in the document
of sale.
(b)  If the purchaser qualifies for the remedies set forth in Subsection
(3)(a) and if the purchaser elects to rescind by returning the purchased motor
vehicle to the dealer within the prescribed time frame, then the purchaser is
liable to the dealer:
(i)  for all physical damage to the motor vehicle while in the possession of
the purchaser; and
(ii)  in an amount equal to the current standard mileage rate for the cost of
operating a motor vehicle established by the federal Internal Revenue Service
for each mile the motor vehicle was driven between the date the purchaser
first acquired possession and the date when the purchaser returned the motor
vehicle to the dealer.
(c)  The purchaser is not entitled to the remedy set forth in Subsections
(3)(a) and (b) if the purchaser materially misrepresents in writing any
information requested by the dealer in an application for financing, financial
statement, or similar document customarily used to elicit personal and
financial data upon which a credit decision is normally predicated.
(4) (a)  A dealer who has complied with Subsection (2)(b), but who has not
been able to secure financing as set forth in the disclosure, shall within
seven days of the date of sale mail written notice to the purchaser:
(i)  disclosing that the dealer has not been able to secure financing as set
forth in the disclosure; and
(ii)  instructing the purchaser of his right to rescind the contract of sale
within 14 calendar days of the date of sale, as provided for in Subsection
(2).
(b) (i)  The dealer shall mail notification to the purchaser within seven
calendar days following the date of sale as set forth in the contract of sale.
(ii)  This notice complies with Subsection (4)(b)(i) if it is postmarked
before the end of the seventh day following the date of sale and addressed to
the purchaser at the address contained in the document of sale.
(iii)  If the purchaser's address is not contained on the document of sale,
then proof of compliance with the notification provision of this Subsection
(4)(b) shall be borne by the dealer.
(iv)  If a dealer gives notice in the manner prescribed, the purchaser has 14
calendar days from the date of sale to elect to rescind the contract of sale,
in accordance with Subsection (2).
(c) (i)  If a dealer executes the disclosure required by Subsection (2)(b),
but is not able to secure financing as set forth in the disclosure, and the
dealer fails to give written notice to the purchaser within seven days, as
provided for in Subsections (4)(a) and (b), then the purchaser may rescind
within seven days of the date he first learns that the dealer has not been
able to secure financing as set forth in the disclosure.
(ii) Except as provided in this Subsection (4)(c), the purchaser's option to
rescind shall be exercised in the manner prescribed in Subsection (3).
(d)  If the purchaser does not exercise the option to rescind within the
specified time limits in Subsections (3) and (4)(c):
(i)  the purchaser is responsible for adherence to the terms and conditions of
the contract of sale;
(ii)  the dealer is not subject to the financing terms set forth in the
disclosure; and
(iii)  if financing is necessary for the purchaser to complete the payment
terms of the contract of sale, the purchaser is solely responsible for making
all the financing arrangements.
(5)  A dealer's failure to execute the disclosure required by Subsection (2),
or its failure to provide written notice to the purchaser within the time
frame specified in this section, subject the dealer to the sanctions in
Section 41-3-701.
(6)  Either the purchaser or a dealer may bring an action to enforce his
rights under this section. The prevailing party in the action is entitled to
reasonable attorneys' fees as part of the costs of suit.
(7)  A motor vehicle returned by the purchaser to the dealer in accordance
with the rescission provisions of this section is not considered sold for
purposes of notice of sale under Section 41-3-301 and for purposes of sales
tax under Title 59, Chapter 12, Sales and Use Tax Act.
